Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1345.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding a section to read:<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 Section 622. Optional TEMPORARY Moratorium on Filing A CCEPTANCE or Consideration of New Applications for High Impact Data Centers.--(a) A municipality may impose by ordinance RESOLUTION a temporary moratorium prohibiting the filing or consideration of documents relating to ON ACCEPTANCE AND CONSIDERATION OF NEW APPLICATIONS FOR high impact data centers as follows:(1) A moratorium may last no longer than 18 months from the ordinance's effective date. THE DURATION OF A TEMPORARY MORATORIUM MAY NOT EXCEED 18 MONTHS AND SHALL BE RETROACTIVE TO THE DATE WHEN THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE MUNICIPALITY GAVE PUBLIC NOTICE AS REQUIRED UNDER 65 PA.C.S. § 709(C.1) (RELATING TO PUBLIC NOTICE).(2) A prohibition TEMPORARY MORATORIUM may apply to an application, petition or submission seeking THAT SEEKS approval, review or relief for a high impact data center, including, but not limited to:(i) a zoning map or text amendments specific to a site or use;(ii) conditional uses, special exceptions or variances; OR (iii) land development plans or subdivision applications . ; or (iv) a building permit or certificate tied to an approval for a high impact data center when the permit or certificate requires prior land use or zoning approval.(3) A TEMPORARY moratorium may not: (i) prohibit the consideration or filing of documents unrelated to high impact data centers;(ii) affect data centers that do not meet the 20260SB1345PN1889 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 definition of a "high impact data center" under subsection (i) (L) ; (iii) suspend enforcement actions or remedial proceedings for violations of law; or(iv) impair routine maintenance or safety upgrades at existing HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTER facilities. (b) (1) A moratorium ordinance TEMPORARY MORATORIUM RESOLUTION RELATED TO APPLICATIONS FOR HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTERS shall identify the planning, study or ordinance- development activities to be undertaken during the TEMPORARY moratorium, which may include:(i) infrastructure capacity assessments, including, but not limited to, assessments relating to water, wastewater or an electrical ELECTRIC grid; (ii) public safety and emergency services impact analysis;(iii) environmental and community impact evaluations; and(iv) drafting and consideration of zoning, subdivision and land development, or other municipal code amendments addressing high impact data centers.(2) A municipality shall make reasonable progress on the activities listed under paragraph (1) during the TEMPORARY moratorium period identified in the ordinance . (c) Prior to the adoption of a moratorium ordinance TEMPORARY MORATORIUM RESOLUTION under this section, the governing body shall conduct a public hearing with notice as required by this act. The ordinance shall include findings supporting the necessity of the moratorium and identifying the moratorium's relationship to the planning activities in 20260SB1345PN1889 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (b).(d) The moratorium may not apply to approvals or permits previously granted. UNDER 65 PA.C.S. § 709(C.1). THE PUBLIC HEARING NOTICE SHALL CLEARLY STATE THAT THE MUNICIPALITY INTENDS TO CONSIDER A TEMPORARY MORATORIUM ON ACCEPTANCE AND CONSIDERATION OF NEW APPLICATIONS FOR HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTERS.(D) A MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT ACCEPT OR CONSIDER AN APPLICATION FOR A HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTER BY CHANGING THE AGENDA UNDER 65 PA.C.S. § 712.1(E) (RELATING TO NOTIFICATION OF AGENCY BUSINESS REQUIRED AND EXCEPTIONS).(E) THE RESOLUTION SHALL INCLUDE FINDINGS SUPPORTING THE NECESSITY OF THE MORATORIUM AND IDENTIFYING THE MORATORIUM'S RELATIONSHIP TO THE PLANNING ACTIVITIES IN SUBSECTION (B).(F) (1) THE TEMPORARY MORATORIUM SHALL NOT APPLY TO THE FOLLOWING : (I) APPLICATIONS OR PERMITS PREVIOUSLY APPROVED OR GRANTED BY THE MUNICIPALITY PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE TEMPORARY MORATORIUM.(II) ACCEPTANCE OR CONSIDERATION OF AN APPLICATION FOR A HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTER THAT HAS, PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE TEMPORARY MORATORIUM, ENTERED INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH A POWER GENERATION FACILITY BY WHICH THE HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTER AND THE POWER GENERATION FACILITY AGREE TO THE CONSTRUCTION AND OPERATION OF THE HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTER AT THE SITE OF THE POWER GENERATION FACILITY, AND FURTHER AGREE THAT THE POWER GENERATION FACILITY WILL SUPPLY ENERGY TO THE HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTER.(2) AN APPLICATION FOR A HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTER THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1)(II) SHALL BE ACCEPTED 20260SB1345PN1889 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND CONSIDERED BY THE MUNICIPALITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH LOCAL ORDINANCES AND THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ACT IN EFFECT ON THE DATE OF THE MUNICIPALITY'S ISSUANCE OF A BUILDING PERMIT FOR THE POWER GENERATION FACILITY.(e) (G) (1) A moratorium ordinance TEMPORARY MORATORIUM RESOLUTION shall provide a process by which an applicant may request a waiver upon a showing that:(i) strict application of the TEMPORARY moratorium would result in substantial, unique and demonstrable UNDUE hardship not created by the applicant; and (ii) granting the waiver would be consistent with the public interest and the purposes of this section . (2) The governing body of the municipality may grant, grant with conditions or deny a waiver REQUEST after a public meeting. The decision shall be in writing and include findings of fact and conclusions.(f) (H) During a moratorium period TEMPORARY MORATORIUM , the municipality shall consult, as applicable, with the county planning agency regarding planning and ordinance updates contemplated under subsection (b).(I) IF A MUNICIPALITY ADOPTS, AMENDS OR REPEALS PROVISIONS OF AN ORDINANCE RELATED TO HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTERS DURING A TEMPORARY MORATORIUM, THE CHANGE TO THE ORDINANCE SHALL NOT BECOME EFFECTIVE PRIOR TO THE EXPIRATION OF THE TEMPORARY MORATORIUM AND SHALL NOT APPLY TO ANY APPLICATION FOR A HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTER RECEIVED BY THE MUNICIPALITY PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE TEMPORARY MORATORIUM. AN APPLICATION THAT IS RECEIVED BY A MUNICIPALITY DURING A TEMPORARY MORATORIUM SHALL BE DEEMED RECEIVED ON THE DAY AFTER THE EXPIRATION OF THE TEMPORARY MORATORIUM.20260SB1345PN1889 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) (J) A TEMPORARY moratorium authorized under this section and implemented in compliance with this act is a reasonable, time- limited planning measure and shall not be construed to effect a taking or to create MUNICIPAL liability for damages if the municipality affords the exemptions and procedures required under this section . (h) (K) (1) Nothing in this section shall: (i) be construed to limit any other municipal powers or procedures authorized under this act, nor to mandate the adoption of a TEMPORARY moratorium; or (ii) alter or diminish the rights of public utilities or electric cooperatives under other applicable statutes LAW . (2) In the event of a conflict with another provision of law, this section shall be harmonized with other provisions of this act to the maximum extent possible.(i) (L) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Critical IT load." The aggregate electrical power drawn by information technology equipment under normal operating conditions at steady state, exclusive of a non-information technology building load."Data center." A facility or group of facilities that is used to house and operate equipment that:(1) receives, stores, aggregates, manages, processes, transforms, retrieves, researches or transmits data; or(2) is necessary for the proper operation of equipment that receives, stores, aggregates, manages, processes, transforms, retrieves, researches or transmits data. ALL OR 20260SB1345PN1889 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PART OF A FACILITY THAT MAY BE COMPOSED OF ONE OR MORE BUSINESSES, OWNERS OR TENANTS, THAT IS OR WILL BE PREDOMINANTLY USED TO HOUSE WORKING SERVERS OR SIMILAR DATA STORAGE SYSTEMS AND THAT MAY HAVE UNINTERRUPTIBLE ENERGY SUPPLY OR GENERATOR BACKUP POWER, OR BOTH, COOLING SYSTEMS, TOWERS AND OTHER TEMPERATURE CONTROL INFRASTRUCTURE."High impact data center." A facility or group of facilities that:(1) is a data center; AND (2) consists of one or more parcels in this Commonwealth, along with the buildings, substations and other infrastructure, fixtures and personal property located on the parcels;(3) is owned, operated or leased by an entity or affiliated group of entities; and(4) (2) has a critical IT load of 25 megawatts or higher."POWER GENERATION FACILITY." A FACILITY THAT IS OPERATIONAL OR UNDER CONSTRUCTION ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION AND WHICH , WHEN CONSTRUCTED, WILL GENERATE ELECTRICITY THAT WILL SUPPLY POWER TO A HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTER AND TO AN ELECTRIC GRID BY INTERCONNECTION TO A REGIONAL TRANSMISSION SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE APPLICABLE REGIONAL TRANSMISSION OPERATOR'S INTERCONNECTION STANDARDS.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1345PN1889 - 7 - <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425